Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2708
Grant; approval.

If a grant of assistance is approved by the department, the applicant shall receive conditional approval of the level of assistance. Projects shall receive funding from the fund in the order conditional approval is received and whenever there is sufficient money in the fund to provide the assistance. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds to support projects which have received conditional approval from the department. A grant of assistance shall be finally approved when funds for the project are appropriated by the Legislature.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 385, § 4.